Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1017.5] Sale or manufacture of
deceptive identification document; penalties. (1) A person commits the
offense of sale or manufacture of deceptive identification document if the
person intentionally or knowingly manufactures, sells, offers for sale,
furnishes, offers to be furnished, transports, offers to be transported, or
imports or offers to be imported into this State a deceptive identification
document.

(2) As used in this section, "deceptive
identification document" means any identification document not issued by a
governmental agency that purports to be, or that might deceive a reasonable
person into believing that it is, an identification document issued by a
governmental agency, including a driver's license, identification card, birth certificate,
passport, or social security card.

(3) The sale or manufacture of a deceptive
identification document is a class C felony.

(4) Any property used or intended for use in
the commission of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit an offense under
this section, or that facilitated or assisted such activity, shall be subject
to forfeiture under chapter 712A. [L 2001, c 230, §1]

Cross References

Protection of personal information, civil remedies, see
chapters 487J, 487N, and 487R.

COMMENTARY ON §710-1017.5

Act 230, Session Laws 2001, created the criminal offense of
the sale or manufacture of deceptive identification documents. Testimony
regarding the measure indicated that identification documents, such as driver
licenses, identification cards, and birth certificates, have become prey to
unscrupulous commercial enterprises that have created a market for selling
falsified official identification documents. False identification documents
could be used in place of authentic documents for everyday purposes, such as
proof of identification, age, or citizenship. Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 1131.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next